languages/apertium-cym/apertium-cym.cym.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<!-- The lowercase letters of the Welsh alphabet followed by letters with accents, followed by letters found in loan words -->
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUWYÂÊÎÔŴŶJKVXZÁÉÍÓÚÄËÏÖÜQabcdefghilmnoprstuwyâêîôŵŷáïjkvxzáéíóúäëïöüq</alphabet>

  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>

    <sdef n="aff"     c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn"      c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pred"    c="Predicative"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="detnt"   c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet"  c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="emph"    c="Emphatic"/>
    <sdef n="pro"     c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="org"     c="Organització"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>

    <sdef n="al"      c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Noun noun"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Adjective noun"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Adjective adjective"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"     c="Pretério perfecto o indefinido"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Pretério imperfecto de indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="cns"     c="Conditional subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"     c="Pretério imperfecto de subjunctivo"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="plu"     c="Pluperfect"/>
    <sdef n="fut"     c="Future"/>

    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"    c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="part"    c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="vpart"   c="Verbal particle"/>

    <sdef n="r1"/>
    <sdef n="s1"/>
    <sdef n="s2"/>
    <sdef n="n1"/>
    <sdef n="a1"/>

    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    
    <sdef n="mon"/>
	
    <sdef n="S1"/>
    <sdef n="postnum"/>
    <sdef n="invariant"/>
	<sdef n="peri"/>
	<sdef n="vrbnull"/>

	
  </sdefs>

  <!-- Paradigm definitions -->
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="proper_names">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* ap [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Rt Hon|Dr).? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Lady|Miss|Ms|Mrs).? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>(Sir|Lord|Mr).? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Syr</l>
          <r>Syr</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ditectif<b/>Sarjant</l>
          <r>Ditectif<b/>Sarjant</r>
        </p>
        <re> ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ditectif</l>
          <r>Ditectif</r>
        </p>
        <re> ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Tad</l>
          <r>Tad</r>
        </p>
        <re> ([A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*|[A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-zäëïöüáéíóúàèìòùâêîôû]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <par n="proper_names"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
